Washington statutes.
RCW 25.15.367

Service of process on unregistered foreign limited liability companies.

Any foreign limited liability company which does business in this state without having registered under Article 5 of chapter 23.95 RCW has thereby consented to service of legal process in accordance with RCW 23.95.450 in any civil action, suit, or proceeding against it in any state or federal court in this state arising or growing out of any business done by it within this state. The doing of business in this state by such foreign limited liability company is a signification of the agreement of such foreign limited liability company that any such process when so served is of the same legal force and validity as if served upon a registered agent personally within this state.

[ 2015 c 176 s 7126; 2015 c 188 s 72.]

NOTES:

Effective date—Contingent effective date—2015 c 176: See note following RCW 23.95.100.